Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-2603
Commission; funds; personnel; office.

The commission may receive and administer funds from state, federal, and other sources and may employ and fix the compensation of personnel of its own choosing. An office for executive management shall be provided.

Laws 2020, LB918, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB69, § 3.